hr-HR: Vrsta izvora podzemne vode: Adapter za slavinu; Priključak za vrtno crijevo; Ručno punjenje (ulijevanje); Sustav pumpe za recirkulaciju; Ostalo
fr: Type d’alimentation en eau de la table à eau: Adaptateur pour robinet; Raccordement pour tuyau d’arrosage; Remplissage manuel (à verser); Système de pompe de recirculation; Autre
en: Water table water source type: Faucet adapter; Garden hose connection; Manual fill (pour-in); Recirculating pump system; Other
ro-RO: Tipul sursei de apă pentru măsuța cu apă: Adaptor pentru robinet; Racord pentru furtun de grădină; Umplere manuală (prin turnare); Sistem cu pompă de recirculare; Altele
lt-LT: Vandens žaidimų stalo vandens šaltinio tipas: Maišytuvo adapteris; Sodo žarnos jungtis; Rankinis užpildymas (įpilamas); Recirkuliacinė pompų sistema; Kita
pl: Typ źródła wody stolika wodnego: Adapter do kranu; Złącze do węża ogrodowego; Napełnianie ręczne (wlewanie); System z pompą obiegową; Inne
ja: ウォーターテーブル給水源タイプ: 蛇口アダプター; ガーデンホース接続; 手動給水 (注ぎ込み); 循環ポンプシステム; その他
nl: Watertafel waterbron type: Kraanadapter; Tuinslangaansluiting; Handmatig vullen (ingieten); Recirculatiepompsysteem; Overige
es: Tipo de fuente de agua de la mesa de agua: Adaptador de grifo; Conexión de manguera de jardín; Llenado manual (verter); Sistema de bomba de recirculación; Otro
el: Τύπος πηγής νερού τραπεζιού νερού: Αντάπτορας βρύσης; Σύνδεση με λάστιχο κήπου; Χειροκίνητο γέμισμα (με ρίψη νερού); Σύστημα αντλίας ανακυκλοφορίας; Άλλο
bg-BG: Тип водоизточник на водната маса: Адаптер за кран; Връзка за градински маркуч; Ръчно пълнене (с наливане); Рециркулационна помпена система; Други
hu: Vízasztal vízforrásának típusa: Csaptelepadapter; Kerti tömlőcsatlakozó; Kézi feltöltés (betöltés); Keringető szivattyúrendszer; Egyéb
cs: Typ zdroje vody pro vodní stůl: Adaptér na kohoutek; Připojení na zahradní hadici; Ruční plnění (nalévání); Systém s recirkulačním čerpadlem; Jiný
nb: Vannkildetype for vannbord: Kranadapter; Hageslangetilkobling; Manuell fylling (helling); Resirkulerende pumpesystem; Annet
it: Tipo di alimentazione dell'acqua del tavolo gioco con acqua: Adattatore per rubinetto; Attacco per tubo da giardino; Riempimento manuale (a versamento); Sistema a pompa di ricircolo; Altro
ko: 물놀이 테이블 물 공급원 유형: 수도꼭지 어댑터; 정원용 호스 연결; 수동 급수(붓기); 순환 펌프 시스템; 기타
ru: Тип подачи воды для водного столика: Адаптер для крана; Подключение садового шланга; Ручное наполнение (заливка); Система с рециркуляционным насосом; Другое
da: Vandkilde til vandbord: Vandhaneadapter; Tilslutning til haveslange; Manuel påfyldning (hældes i); Recirkulerende pumpesystem; Andet
vi: Mực nước ngầm loại nguồn nước: Bộ chuyển đổi vòi nước; Đầu nối vòi vườn; Đổ đầy thủ công (rót vào); Hệ thống bơm tuần hoàn; Khác
pt-PT: Tipo de fonte de água da mesa de água: Adaptador de torneira; Ligação para mangueira de jardim; Enchimento manual (verter); Sistema de bomba de recirculação; Outro
sk-SK: Typ zdroja podzemnej vody: Adaptér na vodovodný kohútik; Pripojenie na záhradnú hadicu; Ručné plnenie (naliatie); Systém s recirkulačným čerpadlom; Iné
zh-TW: 水桌水源類型: 水龍頭轉接器; 花園水管接頭; 手動加水 (倒入); 循環幫浦系統; 其他
tr: Su oyun masası su besleme tipi: Musluk adaptörü; Bahçe hortumu bağlantısı; Manuel dolum (dökerek); Devridaim pompa sistemi; Diğer
zh-CN: 水桌水源类型: 水龙头适配器; 花园软管连接口; 手动注水（倾倒式）; 循环水泵系统; 其他
pt-BR: Mesa de água tipo de fonte de água: Adaptador de torneira; Conexão para mangueira de jardim; Enchimento manual (despejo); Sistema de bomba de recirculação; Outros
th: ประเภทแหล่งน้ำใต้ดิน: อะแดปเตอร์ก๊อกน้ำ; จุดต่อสายยางรดน้ำ; เติมด้วยมือ (เทลงไป); ระบบปั๊มน้ำหมุนเวียน; อื่นๆ
de: Wasserversorgungsart des Wassertischs: Wasserhahn-Adapter; Gartenschlauch-Anschluss; Manuelle Befüllung (Eingießen); Umwälzpumpensystem; Sonstige
sv: Typ av vattenkälla för vattenbord: Kranadapter; Trädgårdsslangsanslutning; Manuell påfyllning (häll i); Cirkulerande pumpsystem; Övrigt
fi: Vesipöydän vedensyöttötyyppi: Hanasovitin; Puutarhaletkun liitäntä; Manuaalinen täyttö (kaadettava); Kiertopumppujärjestelmä; Muu
sl-SI: Vrsta vira vode za vodno mizo: Adapter za pipo; Priključek za vrtno cev; Ročno polnjenje (nalivanje); Sistem obtočne črpalke; Drugo